Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3501
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 77-3501.01 to 77-3505.06 shall be used.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 809, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 376A, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 84, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 902, § 25;

Laws 1995, LB 483, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 182, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB94, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB1087, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB126, § 2.